Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.020

County road fund—Limitation upon expenditures.

Any funds accruing to and to be deposited in the county road fund arising from any levy in any road district shall be expended for proper county road purposes.

[ 1991 c 363 s 87; 1963 c 4 s 36.82.020. Prior: 1943 c 82 s 2, part; 1937 c 187 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6450-6, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.